Arkansas, session 2025, SB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES. There is
hereby established for the Department of Transformation and Shared Services
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC014 SEC OF TRANSFORMATION & SHARED SERVICES 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U061U TSS CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE03
(3) N036N TSS EBD DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(4) N032N TSS OPM DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
*JAP010*
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(5) N031N TSS OSP DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(6) G293C TSS CHIEF GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE SE01
(7) D012N TSS DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE01
(8) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(9) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(10) D136C TSS IT PROJECT MANAGER DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IT10
(11) D141C TSS ERP SYSTEM MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(12) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(13) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(14) D033C DFA ERP ANALYST 5 GRADE IT06
(15) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(16) D027C SOFTWARE ENGINEER 2 GRADE IT06
(17) D142C TSS ERP ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(18) D023C TSS STATE SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(19) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(20) R003C TSS ASST EBD ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS15
(21) R001C TSS ASST PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS15
(22) V001C TSS ASST PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS15
(23) A132C TSS BUSINESS SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS15
(24) G306C TSS CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(25) N207N TSS CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(26) G307C TSS LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(27) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(28) R051C TSS STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER 5 GRADE GS13
(29) V038C TSS IT PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(30) V003C TSS PROCUREMENT DIVISION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS12
(31) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(32) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(33) R052C TSS STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 18 GRADE GS11
(34) G036C TSS DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(35) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS09
(36) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(37) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(38) V034C TSS STATEWIDE PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS09
(39) R053C TSS STATEWIDE PROGRAM SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS09
(40) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(41) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(42) R028C TSS STATEWIDE PAYROLL SYS SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS08
(43) V035C TSS STATEWIDE PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST 16 GRADE GS08
(44) V042C TSS SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS08
(45) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(46) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(47) R018C TSS EBD PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS07
(48) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(49) R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(50) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(51) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(52) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(53) D070C TSS ACCOUNTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(54) V040C TSS BUYER 1 GRADE GS06
(55) R034C TSS EBD BENEFITS SPECIALIST 9 GRADE GS06
(56) V041C TSS SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT 8 GRADE GS06
(57) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 14 GRADE GS05
(58) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(59) C057C ADMINISTRATION SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(60) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 5 GRADE GS04
(61) V021C SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT 2 GRADE GS04
(62) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 168

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Transformation and Shared Services for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty (30) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
services and operating expenses of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $9,055,074
(02) EXTRA HELP 91,512
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,093,407
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,431,672
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 46,600
(C) PROF. FEES 162,589
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0

TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,885,854

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - MARKETING AND
REDISTRIBUTION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Property Sales
Holding Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services - Statewide Shared Services - Marketing
and Redistribution for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $619,090
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 263,698
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 358,605
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,000
(C) PROF. FEES 24,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,271,393

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - PURCHASE AND
CORPORATE TRAVEL CARD PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the
Purchase and Corporate Travel Card Program Fund, for providing appropriation
to allow for rebates coming into the State from vendor banks and for
distribution to participating agencies and for operating expenses connected
with the administration of the program by the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services - Statewide Shared Services - Purchase and Corporate
Travel Card Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $4,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for information technology services expenses of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services - Statewide Shared Services for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES $600,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - COMMISSION
STIPEND AND MILEAGE PAYMENTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Employee Benefits
Division, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for payment of
stipends and mileage to commission members for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(01) PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFIT
ADVISORY COMMISSION MILEAGE & STIPEND
PAYMENTS $50,000
(02) STATE EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFIT
ADVISORY COMMISSION MILEAGE & STIPEND
PAYMENTS 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $100,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES - EMPLOYEE
BENEFITS DIVISION - MISCELLANEOUS CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Statewide Shared Services
- Employee Benefits Division - Miscellaneous Cash for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $927,650
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 367,404
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 953,222
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 71,800
(C) PROF. FEES 24,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 717,700
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,161,776

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - STATE
OPERATIONS. There is hereby established for the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services - Building Authority Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U052U TSS ABA DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) B003N TSS STATE ARCHITECT 1 GRADE GS14
(3) B002N TSS STATE ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS14
(4) U080U TSS ABA DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(5) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 1 GRADE GS11
(6) G036C TSS DIVISION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(7) R019C BUDGET MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(8) B042C ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS09
(9) B021C LICENSED ARCHITECT 2 GRADE GS09
(10) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(11) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(12) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(13) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(14) S013C TSS BUILDING/PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(15) A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(16) X129C CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR 3 GRADE GS05
(17) B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS05
(18) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(19) X153C REAL ESTATE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 26

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - STATE
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Miscellaneous
Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority
Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,591,448
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 569,156
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 45,955
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,200
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,212,759

SECTION 11. REGULAR SALARIES - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - BUILDING
MAINTENANCE. There is hereby established for the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority Division for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) B042C ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS09
(2) S107C TSS BUILDING OPERATIONS ASST MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(3) S094C ADC CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 1 GRADE GS08
(4) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(5) S106C LICENSED TRADESMAN 3 GRADE GS07
(6) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS07
(7) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(8) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(9) S013C TSS BUILDING/PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(10) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(11) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 4 GRADE GS05
(12) S037C TSS BUILDING MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS05
(13) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(14) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 33

SECTION 12. EXTRA HELP - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISON - BUILDING
MAINTENANCE. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority Division for the
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: nine (9) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - BUILDING
MAINTENANCE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Building Authority
Division Maintenance Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority
Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,510,442
(02) EXTRA HELP 15,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 617,095
(04) OVERTIME 40,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 13,659,015
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DEBT SERVICE 5,002,186
(07) CRITICAL MAINTENANCE 6,500,000
(08) FACILITIES MANAGEMENT CONTINGENCY 125,000
(09) RENT OF SPACE 121,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $27,654,738

SECTION 14. REGULAR SALARIES - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - JUSTICE
BUILDING OPERATIONS. There is hereby established for the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority Division for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(2) S037C TSS BUILDING MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - JUSTICE
BUILDING OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Building Authority
Division Maintenance Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority
Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $91,441
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 37,182
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 569,453
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $713,076

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - JUSTICE
BUILDING MAINTENANCE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Justice Building
Fund, for maintenance of the Justice Building by the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority Division for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE $404,293

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - ACQUISITION
AND MAINTENANCE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Building Authority
Division Real Estate Fund, for the acquisition and maintenance of facilities
and land by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Building
Authority Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $300,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 1,506,650
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CONSTRUCTION/ACQUISITION/MAINTENANCE 2,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,306,650

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - JUSTICE
BUILDING CONSTRUCTION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for operating expenses of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Building Authority
Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSTRUCTION $2,000,000

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - SUSTAINABLE
BUILDING DESIGN PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Sustainable
Building Design Revolving Loan Fund, for transfers or loans to state
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
agencies, boards or commissions for construction, renovation, maintenance and
operating expenses of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services -
Building Authority Division - Sustainable Building Design Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LOANS $10,739,371

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for building
improvements by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services -
Building Authority Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BUILDING IMPROVEMENTS $2,865,890

SECTION 21. REGULAR SALARIES - DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS. There
is hereby established for the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services - Division of Information Systems for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U060U TSS DIS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U073U TSS DIS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE03
(3) N013N TSS CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER 1 GRADE SE02
(4) D003N TSS STATE CHIEF SECURITY OFFICER 1 GRADE SE02
(5) N206N TSS CHIEF DATA OFFICER 1 GRADE IT12
(6) D002N STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR LEAD 1 GRADE IT11
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(7) D127C TSS CHIEF OF TECHNOLOGY 1 GRADE IT11
(8) D135C TSS DATA SCIENTIST 1 GRADE IT11
(9) D128C TSS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR 5 GRADE IT11
(10) D134C TSS ENTERPRISE ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT11
(11) D132C TSS ENTERPRISE CLOUD ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT11
(12) D133C TSS ENTERPRISE CLOUD ENGINEER 1 GRADE IT11
(13) D131C TSS ENTERPRISE CLOUD STRATEGIST 1 GRADE IT11
(14) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 3 GRADE IT10
(15) D138C TSS DATA CENTER MANAGER 1 GRADE IT10
(16) D010C TSS DATA WAREHOUSE LEAD 1 GRADE IT10
(17) D137C TSS NETWORK ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(18) D009C TSS OPERATIONS CENTER MANAGER 1 GRADE IT10
(19) D001C STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE IT09
(20) D003C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR LEAD 2 GRADE IT09
(21) D139C TSS DATA ENGINEER 1 GRADE IT09
(22) D130C TSS DISASTER RECOVERY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(23) D125C TSS SR. STATE SERVER ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT09
(24) D005C TSS STATE IT SECURITY ANALYST 3 GRADE IT09
(25) D123C DB ADMINISTRATOR 6 GRADE IT08
(26) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(27) D006C SOFTWARE ENGINEER LEAD 3 GRADE IT08
(28) D014C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE IT08
(29) V039C TSS IT SOURCING PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(30) D004C TSS STATE NETWORK SUPPORT LEAD 3 GRADE IT08
(31) D122C IT PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT07
(32) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(33) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(34) D015C STATE NETWORK ENGINEER 4 GRADE IT07
(35) D042C DATA WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 5 GRADE IT06
(36) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT06
(37) D027C SOFTWARE ENGINEER 6 GRADE IT06
(38) D025C STATE IT SECURITY SPECIALIST 8 GRADE IT06
(39) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(40) D049C TSS PROJECT MANAGER 3 GRADE IT06
(41) D026C TSS STATE HELP DESK LEAD 1 GRADE IT06
(42) D024C TSS STATE NETWORK SPECIALIST 19 GRADE IT06
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(43) D023C TSS STATE SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 12 GRADE IT06
(44) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 14 GRADE IT05
(45) D045C TSS STATE SYSTEMS ANALYST 11 GRADE IT05
(46) D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT04
(47) D032C TSS IT ASSET MANAGER 1 GRADE IT04
(48) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE IT03
(49) D069C TSS SCHEDULER 1 GRADE IT03
(50) D046C TSS STATE PRODUCTION CONTROL SUPVR 2 GRADE IT03
(51) D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR 6 GRADE IT02
(52) A132C TSS BUSINESS SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS15
(53) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(54) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(55) D096C TSS EEF SR SYSTEM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(56) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(57) D031C TSS DISASTER RECOVERY ANALYST 1 GRADE GS10
(58) G069C TSS QUALITY ASSURANCE LEAD 1 GRADE GS10
(59) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS09
(60) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(61) A029C TSS FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(62) G098C TSS QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(63) A068C TSS BILLING SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(64) D041C TSS TECHNICAL ACCOUNTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS08
(65) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(66) D053C TSS ACCOUNT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(67) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(68) D070C TSS ACCOUNTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(69) A048C TSS RATE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(70) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 6 GRADE GS05
(71) D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS05
(72) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(73) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(74) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 3 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 194

SECTION 22. EXTRA HELP - DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Transformation and Shared Services -
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Division of Information Systems for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: eighteen
(18) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Division of
Information Systems Revolving Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Division
of Information Systems for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $13,277,446
(02) EXTRA HELP 215,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,442,905
(04) OVERTIME 66,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 11,224,996
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 75,001
(C) PROF. FEES 575,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) TELECOMMUNICATION/TECHNOLOGY DELIVERY 59,702,882
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $90,579,230

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS - EQUIPMENT
ACQUISITIONS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, to be
payable from the Information Technology Reserve Fund, for major equipment
acquisitions and information technology improvements, as set out in Arkansas
Code §25-4-122 and §25-4-123 by the Department of Transformation and Shared
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Services - Division of Information Systems for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EQUIPMENT ACQUISITIONS AND
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENTS $3,500,000

SECTION 25. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEMS
OFFICE. There is hereby established for the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services - Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) D149C STATE GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYM OFF 1 GRADE IT12
(2) D007N TSS STATE GEOGRAPHIC INFO OFFICER 1 GRADE IT10
(3) D008C TSS GIS LEAD 1 GRADE IT08
(4) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 4 GRADE IT07
(5) D040C GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(6) D023C TSS STATE SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(7) B016N TSS LAND SURVEY STATE SURVEYOR 1 GRADE GS12
(8) B074C SURVEYOR 1 GRADE GS09
(9) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(10) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 13

SECTION 26. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEMS
OFFICE. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services - Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEMS
OFFICE - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, to be payable from the Miscellaneous
Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $937,797
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,463
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 318,867
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 470,742
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 14,350
(C) PROF. FEES 107,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 450,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,305,219

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEMS
OFFICE - GEOSTOR & FRAMEWORK. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Office, to be payable from the Geographic Information
Systems Fund, to carry out the duties, responsibilities, and authority of the
Arkansas State Land Information Board as described by Arkansas Code 15-21-
504; to create, operate, and maintain Geostor, the Arkansas Spatial Data
Infrastructure; and to create, update, maintain, and disseminate framework
spatial data as defined by Arkansas Code 15-21-502 for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GEOSTOR & FRAMEWORK $1,200,000

SECTION 29. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF PROPERTY RISK. There is hereby
established for the Department of Transformation and Shared Services - Office
of Property Risk for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G351C OFFICE OF PROPERTY RISK DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(3) G352C OFFICE OF PROPERTY RISK FINANCIAL DIR 1 GRADE GS14
(4) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(5) G120C RISK CONSULTANT 2 GRADE GS07
(6) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(7) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(8) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF PROPERTY RISK - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services, to be payable from the State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund,
for personal services, operating expenses, and claims of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services - Office of Property Risk for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $747,496
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 298,998
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 80,750,000
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 12,000
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CLAIMS 50,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $134,908,494

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF PROPERTY RISK - RESERVE SUB-FUND.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services, to be payable from the State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund,
for investments of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services -
Office of Property Risk for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INVESTMENTS $75,000,000

SECTION 32. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUILDING
AUTHORITY DIVISION - TRANSFER OF FUNDS - JUSTICE BUILDING OPERATIONS ACTUAL
EXPENDITURES. Building Authority Division may from time to time as may be
necessary and in such amounts as may be necessary and with the approval of
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, request a transfer of funds from the
State Central Services Fund to the Arkansas Building Authority Maintenance
Fund for operation of the Justice Building for actual expenditures, in an
amount not to exceed the dollar amount appropriated in the Justice Building
Operation Section. Upon his or her approval, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall then initiate the necessary transfer documents to reflect the
transfer upon the fiscal records of the State Auditor, the State Treasurer,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and Building Authority Division.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
SECTION 33. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUILDING
AUTHORITY DIVISION - TRANSFER OF FUNDS. Building Authority Division is
hereby authorized, after seeking the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State and the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee to
request transfer from the appropriation made in the Building Maintenance
Section for Building Maintenance to the Acquisition and Maintenance
appropriation in the Acquisition and Maintenance Section and to receive from
another state agency that seeks like approvals its authority, appropriation
and the transfer of funds to be deposited into the Building Authority
Division Real Estate Fund to become part of the Acquisition and Maintenance
appropriation, and to be used for any purposes as set forth by law for said
Real Estate Fund.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that Building Authority Division may operate more efficiently
if some flexibility is provided to Building Authority Division authorizing
broad powers under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and
appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior
approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by
this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the
requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire
section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 34. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUILDING
AUTHORITY DIVISION CONTINGENCY APPROPRIATION TRANSFER AUTHORITY. Building
Authority Division may transfer appropriation and funds as needed from the
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Facilities Management Contingency Appropriation in the Building Maintenance
Section of this Act to any appropriation authorized for Building Authority
Division.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 35. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUILDING
AUTHORITY DIVISION - TRANSFER TO FACILITIES MANAGEMENT CONTINGENCY
APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. (a) In order to provide a more cost effective method
to address the emerging infrastructure needs of Arkansas State Government,
appropriations and funds transferred to the Facilities Management Contingency
Appropriation are to be used in the event that the Building Authority
Division executes one or more building contracts or maintenance agreements
with State Agencies, and the appropriations or funds otherwise provided for
the Building Authority Division are not sufficient to address those needs,
and it is more cost effective for Building Authority Division to execute
these services. Any State Agency may transfer or deposit funds and
appropriations to Building Authority Division - Facilities Management
Contingency Appropriation authorized in the Building Maintenance Section of
this Act to execute one or more building contracts or maintenance agreements
with said State Agencies. Building Authority Division shall provide
justification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for the need of such
appropriations and funds transfers and seek and receive approval of the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State. Building Authority Division shall then seek and
receive the approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee. The requirement of approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council
or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of the section. If the
requirement of approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make the necessary
adjustments on his or her books and the books of the Auditor of the State for
the transfer or deposit of the funds and appropriations from each State
Agency to the appropriation authorized in the Building Maintenance Section of
this Act and to the various Building Authority Division accounts to be used
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
exclusively by Building Authority Division for the fiscal year.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 36. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - SUSTAINABLE BUILDING DESIGN PROGRAM - TRANSFER.
In the event there is not sufficient appropriation and/or funding provided
for by the General Assembly for any state agency, board or commission to
participate in the Sustainable Building Design Program for renovations of
state owned property which exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000), the agency may request a transfer from the Sustainable Building
Design Program appropriation authorized in the Sustainable Building Design
Program Section of this Act from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. The
request shall clearly state the amount required and such other information as
may be required by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State necessary to make a
decision regarding the request. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the State Auditor shall be notified as of the amount and
the purposes for which the appropriation and/or funding is to be transferred
and shall be established upon the books of the Department of Finance and
Administration and the State Auditor. If desired, the appropriation may be
supplemental to those regularly appropriated for like purposes by the General
Assembly for that agency.
Provided further, that all state agencies, boards or commissions shall
have prior approval by the Building Authority Division as authorized for the
Sustainable Building Design Program in accordance with established Rules and
Regulations.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
BUILDING AUTHORITY DIVISION - SUSTAINABLE BUILDING DESIGN PROGRAM - REVOLVING
LOAN FUND. The Sustainable Building Design Program Appropriation is intended
to provide additional appropriation authority for the Sustainable Building
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Design Program. Funding for the program may be made available by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, in the form of a loan, from a transfer from the
Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund after the required review by
the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, approval by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and approval through rules established and
administered by Building Authority Division. Moneys made available for the
repayment of a loan shall be deposited to the credit of the Sustainable
Building Design Revolving Loan Fund as a “Refund to Expenditure” for the year
in which the deposit is made. In the event that the funds for the repayment
of a loan are held in depositories other than the State Treasury, the
administrative head of the affected state agency shall issue a check drawn
against the funds, which shall be deposited in the Sustainable Building
Design Revolving Loan Fund.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BUILDING
AUTHORITY DIVISION - FUNDING TRANSFER - CASH FUND ACCOUNT. Building
Authority Division is authorized to transfer any unspent funds remaining in
any cash fund account established for the management of a state owned
facility managed by, but not owned by, Building Authority Division to the
Building Authority Maintenance Fund to support the facility’s Maintenance and
Operations appropriations.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS - COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL
REGULATIONS.
1. In order to effect compliance with the requirements of state and federal
statutory and regulatory provisions, the Director shall adjust billing rates
or issue billing adjustments to be federally compliant, notwithstanding the
provisions of ACA §25-4-105 and §25-4-119 or funds sufficient to effect
compliance shall be provided the Division from General Revenues, Special
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
Revenues or such other fund sources as may become available. These actions
shall be subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and
approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
2. The Director shall have authority to transfer funds between the
Information Technology Reserve Fund established by ACA §25-4-123 and the
Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund established by ACA §25-4-121
for cash management purposes.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Division of Information Systems may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Division of Information
Systems authorizing broad powers under this section. Therefore, it is both
necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 40. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION - LINE ITEMS - DIVISION OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS - OPERATIONS. After
receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior
review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services is
authorized to transfer appropriation between the line items authorized herein
for the Division of Information Systems - Operations to best utilize
resources to respond to the needs of the Division's customers.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 41. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEMS OFFICE - TRANSFER OF CARRY FORWARD. Any
unexpended balance of funds remaining on June 30 of each fiscal year in the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account for the Arkansas Geographic Information
Systems Office, shall be transferred to the Geographic Information Systems
Fund to be used for operating and maintaining the Arkansas Spatial Data
Infrastructure, creating, updating, maintaining and disseminating framework
spatial data as defined by Arkansas Code §15-21-502.
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of the appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose, etc.
for which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty
(30) days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution
presents its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the biennial budget manuals
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 S4/3/25 SB92
SECTION 42. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 43. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 44. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




04-03-2025 15:10:47 JAP010